Wyoming, session 2025, SF0147.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 35-13-205(a)(iv) and (viii) and
35-13-206(a) are amended to read:
35-13-205. Definitions.
(a) As used in this article:
(iv) "Assistance animal" means an animal that
works, provides assistance or performs tasks for the
benefit of a person with a disability, or provides
emotional support that alleviates one (1) or more
identified symptoms or effects of a person's disability;
(viii) "Service animal" means as defined in 28
C.F.R. 35.104 and 28 C.F.R. 36.104 and includes service
miniature horses pursuant to 28 C.F.R. 35.136 and 28 C.F.R.
36.302(c). "Service animal" shall include a dog that is
being trained to do work or perform tasks for the benefit
of an individual with a disability.
35-13-206. Injuring or killing a service or
assistance animal prohibited; penalties.
(a) Any person who knowingly, willfully and without
lawful cause or justification inflicts, or permits or
directs any animal under his control or ownership to
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0147
ENROLLED ACT NO. 57, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
inflict, serious bodily harm, permanent disability or death
upon any service animal or assistance animal is guilty of a
misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than
six (6) months less than one (1) year, a fine of not more
than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) five thousand
dollars ($5,000.00), or both.
Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
2